Hawaii statutes.
§302A-411 Kindergarten program;
establishment; attendance. (a) The department shall establish and
maintain kindergartens with a program of instruction as a part of the public
school system; provided that:

(1) Attendance in kindergarten shall be mandatory,
unless exempted by subsection (b) or section 302A-1132; and

(2) Charter schools shall not be excluded from
mandatory participation in the program.

(b) Beginning with the 2014-2015 school year,
any parent, guardian, or other person having the responsibility for, or care
of, a child who will be at least five years of age on or before July 31 of the
school year shall enroll the child in a public school kindergarten unless the
child is enrolled at a private school or the child's attendance is otherwise exempt
under section 302A-1132.

(c) The department may accept gifts to
establish and maintain kindergartens. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 1997, c
362, §1; am L 2004, c 219, §2; am L 2006, c 298, §9; am L 2009, c 194, §2; am L
2010, c 183, §2; am L 2012, c 178, §3; am L 2014, c 76, §2]

Cross References

Early childhood education facilities; identifying sites, see
§302A-1506.5.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next